District of Columbia statutes.
50-1731.04

Restricted use of mobile telephone and other electronic devices.

(a)

No person shall use a mobile telephone or other electronic device while operating a moving motor vehicle in the District of Columbia unless the telephone or device is equipped with a hands-free accessory.

(b)

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the following:

(1)

Emergency use of a mobile telephone, including calls to 911 or 311, a hospital, an ambulance service provider, a fire department, a law enforcement agency, or a first-aid squad;

(2)

Use of a mobile telephone by law enforcement and emergency personnel or by a driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, acting within the scope of official duties; or

(3)

Initiating or terminating a telephone call, or turning the telephone on or off.

History

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-124, § 4, 51 DCR 1541

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1731.05 and § 50-1731.06.